Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-184
Voluntary liquidation; approval required; examination; fees.

Whenever any bank shall desire to go into voluntary liquidation, it shall first obtain the written consent of the director who may, before granting such request, order a special examination of the affairs of such bank, for which the same fees may be collected as in regular examination.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 34, p. 83;

R.S.1913, § 313;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 34, p. 699;

C.S.1922, § 8014;

C.S.1929, § 8-153;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 34, p. 153;

C.S.Supp., 1941, § 8-153;

R.S.1943, § 8-158;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 84, p. 167;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 81.